Washington statutes.
RCW 36.12.080

Failure of election—Limitation on subsequent removal election.

When an election has been held and no one place receives three-fifths of all the votes cast, the former county seat shall remain the county seat, and no second election may be held within eight years thereafter.

[ 1985 c 145 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.12.080. Prior: 1890 p 319 s 8; RRS s 4005.]